2018-komp-ling/practicals/Practical2/HFST/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
%{A%}:а %{A%}:е %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
;

Sets

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ ; 

Vowels = ӗ э и ӳ ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 


Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"%{Ӑ%}:0 if there is a surface vowel before the morpheme boundary"

%{Ӑ%}:0 <=> Vowels: %>: _ ;

"%{Ӑ%}:0 if there is previous %{м%}:0"

%{Ӑ%}:0 <=> %{м%}:0 _ ; 

"%{м%}:0 if there is a following %{Ă%}: followed by н"

%{м%}:0 <=> _ %{Ă%}: н: ;

"%{Ă%}:ӑ or %{Ă%}:ӗ according to vowel harmony if previous consonant"

%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;


! a:b   CONSTRAINT_OPERATOR   LEFT_CONTEXT   _   RIGHT_CONTEXT ;
